Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.600

Mental health services—Definition—Coverage required, when.

(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services" means:

(a) For health benefit plans issued or renewed before January 1, 2021, medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on June 11, 2020, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the director by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter 6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes, and services: (i) Substance related disorders; (ii) life transition problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302 through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric association; (iii) skilled nursing facility services, home health care, residential treatment, and custodial care; and (iv) court ordered treatment unless the authority's or contracted insuring entity's medical director determines the treatment to be medically necessary; and

(b) For health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat mental health and substance use disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on June 11, 2020, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the director by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter 6, Laws of 2005.

(2) All health benefit plans offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide coverage for:

(a) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for medical and surgical services; and

(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by the health benefit plan.

(3) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health services be medically necessary, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and surgical services.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the management of mental health.

(5) The director will consider care management techniques for mental health services if a comparable benefit management requirement is applicable to medical and surgical services, including but not limited to: (a) Authorized treatment plans; (b) preauthorization requirements based on the type of service; (c) concurrent and retrospective utilization review; (d) utilization management practices; (e) discharge coordination and planning; and (f) contracting with and using a network of participating providers.

[ 2020 c 228 s 1; 2005 c 6 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2005 c 6: "The legislature finds that the costs of leaving mental disorders untreated or undertreated are significant, and often include: Decreased job productivity, loss of employment, increased disability costs, deteriorating school performance, increased use of other health services, treatment delays leading to more costly treatments, suicide, family breakdown and impoverishment, and institutionalization, whether in hospitals, juvenile detention, jails, or prisons.

Treatable mental disorders are prevalent and often have a high impact on health and productive life. The legislature finds that the potential benefits of improved access to mental health services are significant. Additionally, the legislature declares that it is not cost-effective to treat persons with mental disorders differently than persons with medical and surgical disorders.

Therefore, the legislature intends to require that insurance coverage be at parity for mental health services, which means this coverage be delivered under the same terms and conditions as medical and surgical services." [ 2005 c 6 s 1.]

Severability—2005 c 6: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2005 c 6 s 13.]